New York, session 2025-2026, A10930.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 23-0305 of the environmental conservation law is 2 amended by adding a new subdivision 16 to read as follows: 3 16. The department shall prohibit the use of drilling fluids, brine, 4 and flowback water from gas or oil wells, pools, or fields on any high- 5 way, as defined in subdivision fourteen of section two of the transpor- 6 tation law, for any purpose, including but not limited to use for de-ic- 7 ing, dust suppression or any other use. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 9 it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06152-06-6